Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.440

Construction of chapter when part thereof in conflict with federal requirements which are condition precedent to allocation of federal funds.

If any part of this chapter shall be found to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a condition precedent to the allocation of federal funds to the state, such conflicting part of this chapter is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of such conflict, and such findings or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.440. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 44. Formerly RCW 28.85.440.]

NOTES:

Federal funds, receipt of authorized: RCW 28B.50.520.